Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Division 1. Wyoming Retirement Act
§ 9-3-406.
Retirement board; employment and compensation of director, consulting actuary and assistants; director designated secretary; compensation of members; quorum; seal.

The board shall employ a director and a consulting actuary and other professional and clerical assistants necessary for the administration of the retirement system and the Wyoming deferred compensation program established under W.S.

9-3-501

through

9-3-508

. The compensation of employees shall be fixed by the board, subject to confirmation and approval by the human resources division and together with all other necessary expenses of the board shall be paid by vouchers drawn on the state treasurer of Wyoming. The director shall also serve, without additional compensation, as secretary of the board. The board shall have the authority to obtain the financial and criminal background history of an employee or employment applicant of the Wyoming retirement system in accordance with W.S.

7-19-106

and

7-19-201

. In fixing compensation of employees the board may implement and administer a performance compensation plan in accordance with this subsection. The plan shall:

Be limited to those at-will employees of the board listed in paragraph (ii) of this subsection who are directly engaged in investing assets of the retirement system;

Be limited to the following participating employees:

Chief investment officer;

Senior investment officer;

Investment officer;

Senior analyst;

Analyst.

Seek to maximize total returns net of fees on investments authorized by law and in the best interest of the retirement system;

Be based solely on investment performance exceeding investment benchmarks established pursuant to this paragraph. The board shall establish investment benchmarks, which shall be approved by the investment funds committee created by W.S.

9-4-720

, for each fund and account for an investment period. No performance compensation shall be paid under the plan unless the board determines, subject to review by the investment funds committee, that the established benchmarks have been exceeded;

Measure investment performance during an investment period based one hundred percent (100%) on total fund performance. For purposes of this subsection, “total fund” means the total or overall investment portfolio of the retirement system;

Provide that payments for investment performance for any one (1) investment period shall be as follows:

For payments earned in fiscal year 2020 – the investment performance beginning July 1, 2019 and ending June 30, 2020;

For payments earned in fiscal year 2021 – the arithmetic average of the investment performance beginning July 1, 2019 and ending June 30, 2020 and the investment performance beginning July 1, 2020 and ending June 30, 2021;

For payments earned in fiscal year 2022 and each fiscal year thereafter – the arithmetic average of the annual investment performance beginning that fiscal year and the two (2) immediately preceding fiscal years.

Be funded from investment returns, with each invested fund’s share calculated in proportion to the magnitude of aggregate investment earnings of each fund invested, including interest and dividends, which shall be continuously appropriated for payment of performance compensation as authorized by this subsection;

Include a limit for total payments to all participating employees for performance compensation earned in any one (1) investment period in an amount not to exceed two percent (2%) of net investment returns above the established benchmark of the total fund for that investment period;

Include a limit for total payments to an individual employee for performance compensation earned in any one (1) investment period in an amount not to exceed the following:

One hundred percent (100%) of a chief investment officer’s base salary;

Seventy-five percent (75%) of a senior investment officer’s base salary;

Fifty percent (50%) of an investment officer’s base salary;

Twenty-five percent (25%) of a senior analyst’s or analyst’s base salary.

Provide that performance compensation earned in any one (1) investment period will be paid over a three (3) year period as follows:

Twenty-five percent (25%) during the fiscal year immediately following the fiscal year in which the performance compensation was earned;

Twenty-five percent (25%) during the second fiscal year following the fiscal year in which the performance compensation was earned;

Fifty percent (50%) during the third fiscal year following the fiscal year in which the performance compensation was earned.

Provide that performance compensation shall be forfeited by an employee upon termination of employment subject to an anti–compete agreement for future employment related to asset management. This paragraph shall not apply to termination based on death, disability or retirement;

Provide that performance compensation shall not be included as compensation for the purpose of computing retirement or pension benefits earned by the employee;

Subject participating employees to the following terms and conditions related to leave time:

Chief investment officers, senior investment officers and investment officers shall receive leave time in the same manner and amount as department directors under W.S. 9-2-1706(b);

Senior analysts and analysts shall receive leave time in accordance with standards and rules established or promulgated in accordance with W.S. 9-2-3207(a).

Provide that performance compensation shall only be based on performance criteria occurring on or after the execution of an employment contract in accordance with this subsection. No performance compensation shall be paid other than as provided in the employment contract;

Be submitted to the joint appropriations committee and the select committee on capital financing and investments for comment, and approved by the human resources division, prior to implementation. The human resources division shall not disapprove a performance compensation plan which complies with the requirements of this subsection;

Be submitted and administered by the board as a separately designated and appropriated budget unit.

The members of the board, other than the five (5) elector members shall serve without compensation but shall suffer no loss of wages for the time devoted to the duties of the board. The elector members of the board shall receive fifty dollars ($50.00) per day for the time actually and necessarily devoted to the duties of the board. All members and employees of the board shall be reimbursed for their expenses incurred through service on the board at rates applicable to other state employees.

A majority of the members of the board constitutes a quorum for the transaction of its business. The board may adopt and use a common seal and alter it at the board’s direction.

The board shall report to the joint appropriations committee and the select committee on capital financing and investments by November 1 of each year on the plan authorized by subsection (a) of this section. The report shall include:

Payments and methodology of calculating payments under the plan;

A measurement quantifying the risk resulting from the variation between the prior year’s investment benchmarks and the prior year’s actual investments;

An estimate of future payments under the plan and future expected investment benchmarks.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 114, § 22; 1957, ch. 132, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-299; Laws 1961, ch. 148, § 21; 1965, ch. 115, § 22; 1967, ch. 181, § 19; 1969, ch. 168, § 34; 1973, ch. 158, § 2; W.S. 1977, §§ 9-5-206,

9-3-406

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1987, ch. 202, § 1; 1994, ch. 67, § 2; 2001, ch. 64, § 1; 2006, ch. 114, § 1; 2009, ch. 72, § 1; 2019 ch. 57, § 1, effective February 19, 2019; 2021 ch. 56, § 3, effective April 1, 2021.

The 2006 amendment

substituted “9-3-508” for “9-3-507” in (a).

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

The 2009 amendment,

added the last sentence in (a).

Laws 2009, ch. 72, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved February 26, 2009.

The 2019 amendment,

in the introductory language of (a), substituted "human resources division" for "personnel division" in the second sentence and added at the end "In fixing compensation of employees the board may implement and administer a performance compensation plan in accordance with this subsection.
The plan shall:"; and added (a)(i) through (a)(xvi) and (d).

Laws 2019, ch. 57, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Became law without signature February 19, 2019.

The 2021 amendment

substituted "9-2-3207(a)" for "9-2-1022(a)" in (a)(xiii)(B).

Laws 2021, ch. 56, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 1, 2021.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 9-3-407.
Retirement board; control and management of account containing assets of retirement system; payments from account.

The retirement account is established.

The board has the control and management of the retirement account which shall contain all the assets of the retirement system.

From the retirement account shall be paid:

Refunds of member accounts in accordance with this article;

Benefits for members retired under the terminated systems;

Repealed by Laws 1994, ch. 67, § 3.

Retirement or disability benefits under this article;

Death and survivor benefits as provided for by this article; and

Reasonable administrative expenses under this article.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 114, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 9-300; Laws 1961, ch. 127, § 1; 1971, ch. 263, § 2; 1973, ch. 245, § 3; W.S. 1977, §§ 9-5-207,

9-3-407

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1987, ch. 202, § 1; 1994, ch. 67, §§ 2, 3; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2010, ch. 58, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, deleted “within the trust and agency fund” from the end of (a).

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (c)(vi), substituted “Reasonable administrative expenses” for “Administrative expenses.”

Appropriations. —

Laws 2001, ch. 64, § 3(b), appropriates $25,000 from the Wyoming retirement account established under § 9-3-407(a) and $25,000 from the special account for administrative expenses established under § 9-3-507(a) in the deferred compensation program to the director of the Wyoming retirement system to contract with the retirement system actuary for a study of the retirement system benefits.

Laws 2001 ch. 64, § 8(b), makes section 3 of the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 20, 2001.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 9-3-408.
Designated custodian of retirement account; disbursements; investment of account monies.

The board may designate the state treasurer or a master custodial bank approved by the state treasurer as the custodian of the retirement account. Disbursements from the retirement account for purposes specified in W.S. 9-3-407(c) shall be made upon warrants drawn by the state auditor upon certification by authorized system employees or using an appropriate alternative method approved by the state auditor. All retirement account disbursements shall be accounted for in accordance with the uniform state accounting system or in a manner approved by the state auditor or the state treasurer as provided under W.S.

9-4-214

. As used in this subsection, “authorized system employees” means the director and his designees who have authorized signatures on file with the state auditor.

The board, or its designee, which shall be registered under the Investment Advisor’s Act of 1940 as amended, or any bank as defined in that act, upon written authority, shall invest monies in the retirement account, which investments shall not be considered disbursements for the purposes of W.S.

9-4-214

and subsection (a) of this section. In investing and managing monies in the retirement account, the board, or its designee, shall exercise the judgment and care that a prudent investor would, in light of the purposes, terms, distribution requirements and all other circumstances surrounding the monies in the retirement account, including risk and return objectives established by the board which are reasonably suitable to the purpose of the Wyoming retirement system.

through (vi) Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 148, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 148, § 2.

The director of the retirement system, upon approval and authority of the retirement board, may make use of the services of whatever investment board or commission which has been designated by legislative action for the purpose of assisting in the selection of investments for public funds of this state.

The board may for purposes of this section, retain the services of a custodial bank to supervise a program of securities lending in exchange for a fee or other consideration. Supervision of the program shall include:

Procedures to review the creditworthiness of all borrowers;

Requirements for full collateralization of all loans; and

Other methods and procedures required by the board for securing the lending program.

Repealed by Laws 2006, ch. 51, § 2.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 114, § 20; W.S. 1957, § 9-318; Laws 1967, ch. 153, § 1; 1969, ch. 70, § 1; 1971, ch. 39, § 1; 1973, ch. 245, § 3; W.S. 1977, §§

9-3-424

, 9-5-224; Laws 1981, ch. 175, § 2; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1984, ch. 58, § 1; 1985, ch. 75, § 1; 1987, ch, 7, § 1; ch. 202, § 1; 1993, ch. 140, §§ 1, 2; 1994, ch. 67, § 2; 1995, ch. 173, § 1; 1996, ch. 2, § 1; 1997, ch. 148, §§ 1, 2; 2006, ch. 51, § 2; 2021 ch. 72, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2006 amendment,

repealed (f), concerning the purchasing and definition of mortgage backed securities.

Laws 2006, ch. 51, § 3, makes the act effetive immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2006.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, in the second sentence of (a), deleted "only" following "shall be made" and added "or using an appropriate alternative method approved by the state auditor."

Investment Advisor's Act of 1940. —

The federal Investment Advisor's Act of 1940, referred to in subsection (b), appears as 15 U.S.C. § 80b-1 et seq.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1997, ch. 25, § 1, purported to amend subparagraph (b)(v)(E) of this section, but this amendment was not given effect due to the repeal of paragraph (b)(v) by Laws 1997, ch. 148, § 2.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Measurement of “loss” under § 409(a) of Employee Retirement Income Security Act (29 USC § 1109(a)) due to fiduciaries' improper investment of employee benefit plan assets, 78 ALR Fed 110.

§ 9-3-409.
Retirement board; rules and regulations; powers and privileges required to perform functions; requiring employers to furnish information and keep records.

The retirement board shall adopt rules and regulations for the administration of the retirement system and the control and disbursement of its assets, the administration of the Wyoming deferred compensation program established under W.S.

9-3-501

through

9-3-508

and shall have the powers and privileges required in the performance of its functions under this article and W.S.

9-3-501

through

9-3-508

.

The board shall:

Regulate the duties of participating employers imposed by this article;

Specify the time, place, amount and manner in which contributions shall be withheld and paid;

Require employers to furnish information in written or electronic format and keep records necessary for the discharge of its duties under this article. The board shall assist employers in complying with any electronic reporting requirements imposed under this paragraph;

Require any county memorial hospital or special hospital district electing to participate in the Wyoming retirement system to provide written notice to the board of its election pursuant board issued guidelines. The board shall not implement coverage for any county memorial hospital or special hospital district employee until funds payable to the Wyoming retirement system are received for deposit into the retirement account, as necessary for maintaining the actuarial integrity of the account and funding all liability arising under this act, for years of service prior to the date of entry or expansion of coverage.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 114, § 21; W.S. 1957, § 9-301; W.S. 1977, §§ 9-5-208,

9-3-408

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1987, ch. 202, § 1; 1994, ch. 67, § 2; 2001, ch. 46, § 1; ch. 64, § 1; 2006, ch. 114, § 1; 2009, ch. 108, § 1.

The 2006 amendment

substituted “9-3-508” for “9-3-507” in (a).

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

The 2009 amendment,

added (b)(iv).

Laws 2009, ch. 108, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 2, 2009.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 9-3-410.
Retirement board; actuarial investigation and valuation of system; annual valuation of assets and liabilities to be prepared and published; public record of proceedings.

The retirement board shall keep in convenient form data necessary for actuarial valuations and investigations of the retirement system. At least once in each six (6) year period, the board shall cause an actuarial valuation to be made of the retirement system. An actuarial investigation of all the experience under the retirement system shall be made at times the board directs but not less often than once in each eight (8) year period.

The board shall cause an annual valuation to be made of the assets and liabilities of the retirement system and shall prepare an annual statement of the accrued liability contribution rate which, after approval by the legislature, shall be payable by the employers. The board shall also publish annually the valuation of the assets and liabilities and a statement of receipts and disbursements of the retirement system.

The board shall keep a record of all of its proceedings which shall be open to public inspection.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 114, § 23; W.S. 1957, § 9-302; Laws 1961, ch. 176, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§ 9-5-209,

9-3-409

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1987, ch. 202, § 1.

§ 9-3-411.
Retirement board; right to hearing before board; judicial review.

Any person aggrieved by any ruling of the board is entitled to a hearing before the board after giving reasonable notice. The decision of the board upon hearing is a final administrative decision and is subject to judicial review in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 114, § 24; W.S. 1957, § 9-303; W.S. 1977, §§ 9-5-210,

9-3-410

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1987, ch. 202, § 1; 1997, ch. 38, § 1.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

§ 9-3-412.
Members’ contributions; payroll deductions; employer authorized to pay employee’s share.

Except as otherwise provided in this section and W.S.

9-3-431

and

9-3-432

, every member covered under this article, shall pay into the account eight and one-half percent (8.5%) of his salary for the period from September 1, 2018 through June 30, 2019, eight and three-quarters percent (8.75%) of his salary for the period from July 1, 2019 through June 30, 2020, nine percent (9%) of his salary for the period from July 1, 2020 through June 30, 2021 and thereafter nine and one-quarter percent (9.25%) of his salary. Every firefighter member covered under this article shall pay into the account seven percent (7%) of his salary. Payments shall be deducted each pay period from each member’s salary by the chief fiscal officer of each participating employer. Employee contributions shall be transferred to the account in accordance with subsection (c) of this section.

Except as provided by W.S. 9-2-3207(a)(xi)(F)(III) or (IV), in order to be treated as employer contributions for the sole purpose of determining tax treatment under the United States Internal Revenue Code, section 414(h) the contributions required by subsection (a) of this section shall be paid by the employer for state employee members and may be paid by the employer for member employees of political subdivisions of this state. Any contract employee authorized to participate in the state retirement system under W.S. 9-2-3207(a)(xi)(F)(III) shall pay the entire member contribution and the entire employer contribution under W.S.

9-3-413

. For the contributions as provided by W.S. 9-2-3207(a)(xi)(F)(IV), the contributions required by subsection (a) of this section may be paid by the Wyoming livestock board for state employee members in order to be treated as employer contributions for the sole purpose of determining tax treatment under the United States Internal Revenue Code, section 414(h). The amounts shall be stated in the employment contract.

The contributions under subsection (b) of this section shall be paid from the source of funds which is used in paying salary to the member. The employer may pay these contributions by a reduction in cash salary of the member or by an offset against a future salary increase, or by a combination of a reduction in salary and an offset against a future salary increase, provided:

No salary reduction, offset or combination thereof shall exceed the percentage amount actually deducted from a member’s salary for contributions to the Wyoming retirement system;

Except as provided in paragraphs (iii) and (iv) of this subsection, any employer may pay any amount of a member’s share of retirement contributions without a salary reduction, offset or combination thereof;

For state employee members five and fifty-seven hundredths percent (5.57%) of the member’s salary shall be paid by the employer without any salary reduction or offset. The remaining portion of the state employee’s contribution shall be paid through a reduction in cash salary of the state employee unless specified otherwise by legislative act;

For full-time brand inspection contract employees authorized to participate in the state retirement system under W.S. 9-2-3207(a)(xi)(F)(IV), not more than five and fifty-seven hundredths percent (5.57%) of the contract employee’s salary shall be paid by the livestock board unless specified otherwise by legislative act.

Repealed by Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 82, § 3.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 114, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 9-304; Laws 1963, ch. 16, § 1; 1965, ch. 83, § 1; 1967, ch. 81, § 1; 1973, ch. 158, § 2; 1975, ch. 105, § 1; 1976, ch. 25, § 1; 1977, ch. 87, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§ 9-5-211,

9-3-411

; Laws 1979, ch. 110, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1983, ch. 149, § 1; 1987, ch. 202, § 1; 1989, ch. 167, § 1; 1992, ch. 15, § 1; 1994, ch. 67, § 2; 1997, ch. 60, § 1; 1997, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 2; 1998, ch. 32, § 1; ch. 98, § 1; 2001, ch. 65, § 2; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 82, §§ 2, 3; 2007, ch. 205, § 1; 2010, ch. 85, § 1; 2013 ch. 203, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2014 ch. 19, § 1, effective March 4, 2014; 2018 ch. 119, § 1, § 1, effective September 1, 2018; 2021 ch. 56, § 3, effective April 1, 2021.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (b) deleted “or (IV)” preceding “shall pay the entire member” and added the last sentence.

The 2010 amendment,

effective September 1, 2010, in (a), substituted “seven percent (7%)” for “five and fifty-seven hundredths percent (5.57%)” and added the third sentence; in (b), deleted “From and after July 1, 1983 and” at the beginning, inserted “in order to be treated as employer contributions for the sole purpose of determining tax treatment under the United States Internal Revenue Code, section 414(h),” deleted “in order to be treated as employer contributions for the sole purpose of determining tax treatment under the United States Internal Revenue Code, section 414(h)” at the end of the first sentence, deleted “Unless otherwise specified by contract” at the beginning of the second sentence, and deleted “From and after July 1, 2007 and” at the beginning of the third sentence; deleted “as of July 1, 1983; and” at the end of (c)(i); inserted “Except as provided in paragraphs (iii) and (iv) of this subsection” at the beginning of (c)(ii); and added (c)(iii) and (c)(iv).

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013,
in (a) deleted
“and firefighter members”, added “until August 31, 2013, and thereafter seven and one-half percent (7.5%) of his salary”, and added the second sentence; and added “, except that for the period from September 1, 2013 through August 31, 2016 five and eighty-two hundredths percent (5.82%),” in (c)(iii) and (c)(iv).

The 2014 amendment,

in the first sentence of (a), deleted “seven percent (7%) of his salary until August 31, 2013, and thereafter” following “into the account,” and added “for the period from September 1, 2013 through June 30, 2014, and thereafter eight and one-quarter percent (8.25%) of his salary” at the end; in (c)(iii) and (c)(iv), substituted “June 30, 2014” for “August 31, 2016,” and inserted “for the period from July 1, 2014 through June 30, 2016 six and one hundred ninety-five thousandths percent (6.195%), and for the perod from July 1, 2016 through June 30, 2017 five and nine hundred forty-five thousandths percent (5.945%).”

Laws 2014, ch. 19, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2014.

The 2018 amendment,

effective September 1, 2018, in (a), in the first sentence, substituted “eight and one-half percent (8.5%) of his salary for the period from September 1, 2018 through June 30, 2019, eight and three-quarters percent (8.75%) of his salary for the period from July 1, 2019 through June 30, 2020, nine percent (9%) of his salary for the period from July 1, 2020 through June 30, 2021 and thereafter nine and one-quarter percent (9.25%)” for “seven and one-half percent (7.5%) of his salary for the period from September 1, 2013 through June 30, 2014, and thereafter eight and one-quarter percent (8.25%)”; in (c)(iii), deleted “except that for the period from September 1, 2013 through June 30, 2014 five and eighty-two hundredths percent (5.82%), for the period from July 1, 2014 through June 30, 2016 six and one hundred ninety-five thousandths percent (6.195%), and for the period from July 1, 2016 through June 30, 2017 five and nine hundred forty-five thousandths percent (5.945%)” following “five and fifty-seven hundredths percent (5.57%)” and deleted “and” at the end; and in (c)(iv), deleted “except that for the period from September 1, 2013 through June 30, 2014 five and eighty-two hundredths percent (5.82%), for the period from July 1, 2014 through June 30, 2016 six and one hundred ninety-five thousandths percent (6.195%), and for the period from July 1, 2016 through June 30, 2017 five and nine hundred forty-five thousandths percent (5.945%),” following “five and fifty-seven hundredths percent (5.57%)”.

The 2021 amendment

, in the first sentence of (b), substituted "9-2-3207(a)(xi)(F)(III) or (IV)" for "9-2-1022(a)(xi)(F)(III) or (IV)" and "9-2-3207(a)(xi)(F)(III)" for "9-2-1022(a)(xi)(F)(III)," "9-2-3207(a)(xi)(F)(IV)" for "9-2-1022(a)(xi)(F)(IV)" in the second sentence; and substituted "9-2-3207(a)(xi)(F)(IV)" for "9-2-1022(a)(xi)(F)(IV)" in (c)(iv).

Laws 2021, ch. 56, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 1, 2021.

Internal Revenue Code. —

The federal Internal Revenue Code, referred to in subsection (b), appears as 26 U.S.C.

Cited

in

Tollefson v. Wyo. State Ret. Bd. (In re Tollefson), 2003 WY 150, 79 P.3d 518,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 181

(Wyo. 2003).

§ 9-3-413.
Employer’s contributions; payable monthly; transfer to account; interest imposed upon delinquent contributions; recovery.

Except as provided by W.S. 9-2-3207(a)(xi)(F)(III) or (IV),

9-3-431

and

9-3-432

, each employer excluding employers of firefighter members, shall on a monthly basis, pay into the account a contribution equal to eight and sixty-two hundredths percent (8.62%) of the salary paid to each of its members covered under this article for the period from September 1, 2018 through June 30, 2019, eight and eighty-seven hundredths percent (8.87%) of the salary paid for the period from July 1, 2019 through June 30, 2020, nine and twelve hundredths percent (9.12%) of the salary paid for the period from July 1, 2020 through June 30, 2021 and thereafter nine and thirty-seven hundredths percent (9.37%) of the salary paid. Employers of firefighter members shall pay into the account a contribution equal to seven and twelve hundredths percent (7.12%) of the salary paid. Employer contributions for any month, together with the members’ contributions for that month, if any, shall be transferred to the board not later than the twelfth day of the following month. These contributions shall be credited to the account in a manner as directed by the board. Any employer failing to transfer contributions under this section in sufficient time for the board to receive the contributions by the twenty-fifth day of the month due shall be assessed interest at the assumed rate of return as determined by the board, compounded annually. Interest imposed under this section shall be payable not later than the twelfth day of the next succeeding month. If the contributions and any interest imposed under this section are not transferred to the board when due, they may be recovered, together with court costs, in an action brought for that purpose in the first judicial district court in Laramie County, Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 114, § 7; W.S. 1957, § 9-305; Laws 1963, ch. 16, § 2; 1965, ch. 83, § 2; 1967, ch. 81, § 2; 1973, ch. 158, § 2; 1975, ch. 105, § 1; 1976, ch. 25, § 1; 1977, ch. 87, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§ 9-5-212,

9-3-412

; Laws 1979, ch. 110, § 1; 1981, ch. 39, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1987, ch. 202, § 1; 1994, ch. 67, § 2; 1998, ch. 32, § 1; ch. 98, § 1; 2001, ch. 46, § 1; ch. 65, § 2; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 82, § 2; 2010, ch. 85, § 1; 2013 ch. 203, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2014 ch. 19, § 1, effective March 4, 2014; 2015 ch. 10, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2018 ch. 119, § 1, § 1, effective September 1, 2018; 2021 ch. 56, § 3, effective April 1, 2021.

The 2010 amendment,

effective September 1, 2010, substituted “seven and twelve hundredths percent (7.12%)” for “five and sixty-eight hundredths percent (5.68%),” and deleted “and may on a monthly basis, pay into the account any amount of the members' share of retirement contributions” at the end of the first sentence.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added “until August 31, 2014,” and added the second and third sentences.

The 2014 amendment,

in the first and third sentences, substituted “June 30, 2014” for “August 31, 2014”; in the second sentence, substituted “For the period from July 1, 2014 through June 30, 2015” for “Thereafter” at the beginning, and added “and thereafter eight and thirty-seven hundredths percent (8.37%) of the salary paid” at the end.

Laws 2014, ch. 19, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2014.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, substituted “assumed rate of return as determined by the board, compounded annually” for “rate of eight percent (8%) per annum” at the end of the sixth sentence.

The 2018 amendment,

effective September 1, 2018, in the first sentence, substituted “excluding” for “including” and “eight and sixty-two hundredths percent (8.62%) of the salary paid to each of its members covered under this article for the period from September 1, 2018 through June 30, 2019, eight and eighty-seven hundredths percent (8.87%) of the salary paid for the period from July 1, 2019 through June 30, 2020, nine and twelve hundredths percent (9.12%) of the salary paid for the period from July 1, 2020 through June 30, 2021 and thereafter nine and thirty-seven hundredths percent (9.37%) of the salary paid” for “seven and twelve hundredths percent (7.12%) until June 30, 2014, of the salary paid to each of its members covered under this article. For the period from July 1, 2014 through June 30, 2015, each employer, excluding employers of firefighter members, shall on a monthly basis, pay into the account a contribution equal to seven and sixty-two hundredths percent (7.62%) of the salary paid and thereafter eight and thirty-seven hundredths percent (8.37%) of the salary paid. After June 30, 2014.”

The 2021 amendment

substituted "9-2-3207(a)(xi)(F)(III) or (IV)" for "9-2-1022(a)(xi)(F)(III) or (IV)" in the first sentence.

Laws 2021, ch. 56, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 1, 2021.

§ 9-3-414.
Provision for employers' contributions to be made in budgets; notice to department heads.

Provision for the payment by employers of the employers’ contributions under this article shall be made in the budgets of the several departments, divisions and subdivisions of the state government and of other employer units. At least thirty (30) days prior to the date for submission of departmental budgets to the state budget officer, the Wyoming retirement board shall notify all department heads that it will be necessary to include funds in the departmental budget for the payment of employers’ contributions under this article for the ensuing appropriation period.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 114, § 26; W.S. 1957, § 9-319; W.S. 1977, §§

9-3-425

, 9-5-225; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1987, ch. 202, § 1.